California, session 20252026, AB1892.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4775 of the Civil Code is amended to read:4775. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the association is responsible for repairing, replacing, and maintaining the common area.(2) (A) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, or unless the utility service that failed is required to be maintained, repaired, or replaced by a public, private, or other utility service provider, the association is responsible for repairs and replacements necessary to restore interrupted gas, heat, water, or electrical services when the interruption in service begins in the common area even if the matter extends into a separate interest or the exclusive use common area appurtenant to a separate interest.(B) This paragraph does not change any legal duty or obligation of a utility company or local government to repair or replace components pertaining to gas, heat, water, or electrical services.(3) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the owner of each separate interest is responsible for repairing, replacing, and maintaining that separate interest.(4) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the owner of each separate interest is responsible for maintaining the exclusive use common area appurtenant to that separate interest and the association is responsible for repairing and replacing the exclusive use common area.(b) (1) An association’s board shall commence the process to make the repairs necessary to restore gas, heat, water, or electrical services, as required by this section, within 14 days of the interruption of services.(2) If there are insufficient reserve funds available to cover the costs of repairs or replacements, as required by this section, an association may obtain competitive financing from a financial institution, in compliance with Section 5735, to pay for the costs of the repairs or replacements described in paragraph (1) without requiring a vote of the members and levy an emergency assessment to allow for the repayment of the loan. However, before obtaining that financing, the board shall pass a resolution containing written findings regarding the nature of the association’s expenses and how the association’s reserves do not cover the necessary costs. The resolution shall be distributed to the members with the notice of the emergency assessment and with notices otherwise required by law or governing documents pursuant to the board’s action, if any.(3) Notwithstanding any other section of law or the association’s governing documents, if an association’s board is unable to meet a quorum within 14 days, pursuant to this section, then at the next duly noticed board meeting following the 14th day, the requirements for a quorum shall be reduced so that the total number of directors at that board meeting shall constitute a quorum. This reduced quorum shall only apply for the vote to commence the process specified in paragraph (1). The notice shall contain a provision indicating the use of a reduced quorum.(4) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 4910, if directors of an association are required to vote to initiate any repairs or replacements pursuant to this subdivision, voting may be performed by electronic means, including, but not limited to, email. All records of the vote shall be deemed association records and subject to the inspection and retention rules specified in Section 5210.(c) The costs of temporary relocation during the repair, replacement, or maintenance of the areas within the responsibility of the association shall be borne by the owner of the separate interest affected.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to result in the personal liability of a director of an association.(e) This section shall not apply if the association is in an area affected by one or more of the following conditions, and such condition or conditions materially affect the association’s ability to perform its responsibilities pursuant to this section:(1) A state of disaster or emergency declared by the federal government.(2) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.(3) A local emergency proclaimed by a local governing body or official under Section 8630 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. Section 5103 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5103. Notwithstanding the secret balloting requirement in Section 5100, or any contrary provision in the governing documents, when, as of the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115, the number of qualified candidates is not more than the number of vacancies to be elected, as determined by the inspector or inspectors of the elections, the association may, but is not required to, consider the qualified candidates elected by acclamation if all of the following conditions have been met:(a) The association has held a regular election for the directors in the last three years. The three-year time period shall be calculated from the date ballots were due in the last full election to the start of voting for the proposed election.(b) The association provided individual notice of the election and the procedure for nominating candidates as follows:(1) Initial notice at least 30 days before the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115. The initial notice shall include all of the following:(A) The number of board positions that will be filled at the election.(B) The deadline for submitting nominations.(C) The manner in which nominations can be submitted.(D) A statement informing members that if, at the close of the time period for making nominations, there are the same number or fewer qualified candidates as there are board positions to be filled, then the board of directors may, after voting to do so, seat the qualified candidates by acclamation without balloting.(2) A reminder notice between 7 and 30 days not less than 10 days before the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115. The reminder notice shall include all of the following:(A) The number of board positions that will be filled at the election.(B) The deadline for submitting nominations.(C) The manner in which nominations can be submitted.(D) A list of the names of all of the qualified candidates to fill the board positions as of the date of the reminder notice.(E) A statement reminding members that if, at the close of the time period for making nominations, there are the same number or fewer qualified candidates as there are board positions to be filled, then the board of directors may, after voting to do so, seat the qualified candidates by acclamation without balloting. This statement is not required if, at the time the reminder notice will be delivered, the number of qualified candidates already exceeds the number of board positions to be filled.(c) (1) The association provides, within seven business days of receiving a nomination, a written or electronic communication acknowledging the nomination to the member who submitted the nomination.(2) The association provides, within seven business days of receiving a nomination, a written or electronic communication to the nominee, indicating either of the following:(A) The nominee is a qualified candidate for the board of directors.(B) The nominee is not a qualified candidate for the board of directors, the basis for the disqualification, and the procedure, which shall comply with Article 2 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 10, by which the nominee may appeal the disqualification.(3) The association may combine the written or electronic communication described in paragraphs (1) and (2) into a single written or electronic communication if the nominee and the nominator are the same person.(d) (1) The association permits all candidates to run if nominated, except for nominees disqualified for running as allowed or required pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 5105.(2) If an association disqualifies a nominee pursuant to this subdivision, an association in its election rules shall also require a director to comply with the same requirements.(e) The association board votes to consider the qualified candidates elected by acclamation at a meeting pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4900) for which the agenda item reflects the name of each qualified candidate that will be seated by acclamation if the item is approved.SEC. 3. Section 5105 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5105. (a) An association shall adopt operating rules in accordance with the procedures prescribed by Article 5 (commencing with Section 4340) of Chapter 3, that do all of the following:(1) Ensure that if any candidate or member advocating a point of view is provided access to association media, newsletters, or internet websites during a campaign, for purposes that are reasonably related to that election, equal access shall be provided to all candidates and members advocating a point of view, including those not endorsed by the board, for purposes that are reasonably related to the election. The association shall not edit or redact any content from these communications but may include a statement specifying that the candidate or member, and not the association, is responsible for that content.(2) Ensure access to the common area meeting space, if any exists, during a campaign, at no cost, to all candidates, including those who are not incumbents, and to all members advocating a point of view, including those not endorsed by the board, for purposes reasonably related to the election.(3) Specify the qualifications for candidates for the board and any other elected position, subject to subdivision (b), and procedures for the nomination of candidates, consistent with the governing documents. A nomination or election procedure shall not be deemed reasonable if it disallows any member from nominating themself for election to the board.(4) Specify the voting power of each membership, the authenticity, validity, and effect of proxies, and the voting period for elections, including the times at which polls will open and close, consistent with the governing documents.(5) Specify a method of selecting one or three independent third parties as inspector or inspectors of elections utilizing one of the following methods:(A) Appointment of the inspector or inspectors by the board.(B) Election of the inspector or inspectors by the members of the association.(C) Any other method for selecting the inspector or inspectors.(6) Allow the inspector or inspectors to appoint and oversee additional persons to verify signatures and to count and tabulate votes as the inspector or inspectors deem appropriate, provided that the persons are independent third parties who meet the requirements in subdivision (b) of Section 5110.(7) Require retention of, as association election materials, both a candidate registration list and a voter list. The candidate list shall include names and addresses of individuals nominated as a candidate for election to the board of directors. The voter list shall include the name, voting power, and either the physical address of the voter’s separate interest, the parcel number, or both. The mailing address for the ballot shall be listed on the voter list if it differs from the physical address of the voter’s separate interest or if only the parcel number is used. The association shall permit members to verify the accuracy of their individual information on both lists at least 30 days before the ballots are distributed. The association or member shall report any errors or omissions to either list to the inspector or inspectors who shall make the corrections within two business days.(b) An association shall disqualify a person from a nomination as a candidate for not being a member of the association at the time of the nomination. An association shall disqualify a nominee if that person has served the maximum number of terms or sequential terms allowed by the association. A director who ceases to be a member shall be disqualified from continuing to serve as a director.(1) This subdivision does not restrict a developer from making a nomination of a nonmember candidate consistent with the voting power of the developer as set forth in the regulations of the Department of Real Estate and the association’s governing documents.(2) If title to a separate interest parcel is held by a legal entity that is not a natural person, the governing authority of that legal entity shall have the power to appoint a natural person to be a member for purposes of this article.(c) Through its bylaws or election operating rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) only, an association may disqualify a person from nomination as a candidate pursuant to any of the following:(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), an association may require a nominee for a board seat, and a director during their board tenure, to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments, which are consumer debts subject to validation. If an association requires a nominee to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments, it shall also require a director to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments.(2) An association may disqualify a person from nomination as a candidate if the person, if elected, would be serving on the board at the same time as another person who holds a joint ownership interest in the same separate interest parcel as the person and the other person is either properly nominated for the current election or an incumbent director.(3) An association may disqualify a nominee if that person has been a member of the association for less than one year.(4) An association may disqualify a nominee if that person discloses, or if the association is aware or becomes aware of, a past criminal conviction that would, if the person was elected, either prevent the association from purchasing the insurance required by Section 5806 or terminate the association’s existing insurance coverage required by Section 5806 as to that person should the person be elected.(d) An association may disqualify a person from nomination for nonpayment of regular and special assessments, but may not disqualify a nominee for nonpayment of fines, fines renamed as assessments, collection charges, late charges, or costs levied by a third party. The person shall not be disqualified for failure to be current in payment of regular and special assessments if either of the following circumstances is true:(1) The person has paid the regular or special assessment under protest pursuant to Section 5658.(2) The person has entered into and is in compliance with a payment plan pursuant to Section 5665.(e) An association shall not disqualify a person from nomination if the person has not been provided the opportunity to engage in internal dispute resolution pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 10.(f) If an association disqualifies a nominee pursuant to this section, an association in its election rules shall also require a director to comply with the same requirements.(g) Except as provided in subdivision (i), notwithstanding any other law, the rules adopted pursuant to this section may provide for the nomination of candidates from the floor of membership meetings or nomination by any other manner. Those rules may permit write-in candidates for ballots.(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the rules adopted pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:(1) Prohibit the denial of a ballot to a member for any reason other than not being a member at the time when ballots are distributed.(2) Prohibit the denial of a ballot to a person with general power of attorney for a member.(3) Require the ballot of a person with general power of attorney for a member to be counted if returned in a timely manner.(4) Require the inspector or inspectors of elections to deliver, or cause to be delivered, at least 30 days before an election, to each member both of the following documents:(A) The ballot or ballots.(B) A copy of the election operating rules. Delivery of the election operating rules may be accomplished by any of the following methods:(i) Posting the election operating rules to an internet website and including the corresponding internet website address on the ballot together with the phrase, in at least 12-point type: “The rules governing this election may be found here:”(ii) Individual delivery.(iii) Election operating rules adopted pursuant to this section shall not be amended less than 90 days prior to an election.(i) Notwithstanding an association’s governing documents, the association may adopt an election operating rule that allows an association to utilize an inspector or inspectors of elections, as specified in Section 5110, to conduct an election by electronic secret ballot, except for an election regarding regular or special assessments, as provided for in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5600).(1) An election operating rule adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following purposes:(A) Permitting a member to change their preferred method of voting from electronic secret ballot to written ballot or written ballot to electronic secret ballot no later than 90 days before an election.(B) Requiring an electronic secret ballot and a written ballot to contain the same list of items being voted on.(C) (i) For an election operating rule where a member is permitted to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot to vote by written ballot, requiring the association to mail a written ballot only to a member who has opted out of voting by electronic secret ballot or for whom the association does not have an email address required to vote by electronic secret ballot.(ii) For an election operating rule where a member who is permitted to opt into voting by electronic secret ballot, requiring the association to send an electronic secret ballot only to a member who has opted into voting by electronic secret ballot.(D) Requiring the association to maintain a voting list identifying which members will vote by electronic secret ballot and which members will vote by written ballot, and include information on the procedures to either opt out of or opt into voting by electronic secret ballot, as applicable, in the annual statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310.(E) Requiring a member who votes by electronic secret ballot to provide a valid email address to the association.(F) Prohibiting nomination of candidates from the floor of membership meetings, notwithstanding subdivision (g).(2) An electronic secret ballot may be accompanied by or contained in an electronic individual notice in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4040.(3) (A) No later than 30 days before the election, and pursuant to subparagraph (B), the association shall deliver individual notice of the electronic secret ballot to each member who is electronically voting. That notice shall contain instructions on both of the following:(i) How to obtain access to that internet-based voting system.(ii) How to vote by electronic secret ballot.(B) Delivery of the individual notice described in subparagraph (A) may be accomplished by electronic submission to an address, location, or system designated by the member.(4) For an election operating rule where members are permitted to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot to vote by written ballot, the association shall provide individual notice, delivered pursuant to Section 4040, at least 30 days before the deadline to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot, of all of the following:(A) The member’s current voting method.(B) If the member’s voting method is by electronic secret ballot and the association has an email address for the member, the email address of the member that will be used for voting by electronic secret ballot.(C) An explanation that the member is required to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot if the member elects to vote by written secret ballot.(D) An explanation of how a member may opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot.(E) The deadline by which the member is required to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot if the member elects to exercise that right.(5) A vote made by electronic secret ballot is effective when it is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by an inspector or inspectors of elections.(6) A vote made by electronic secret ballot shall not be revoked.(7) If the association does not have a member’s email address required to vote by electronic secret ballot by the time at which ballots are to be distributed, the association shall send the member a written secret ballot.(8) For purposes of determining a quorum, a member voting by electronic secret ballot pursuant to this subdivision shall be counted as a member in attendance at the meeting. Once the quorum is established, a substantive vote of the members shall not be taken on any issue other than the issues specifically identified in the electronic vote.(9) As used in this subdivision, “electronic secret ballot” means a ballot conducted by an electronic voting system that ensures the secrecy and integrity of a ballot pursuant to the requirements of this article.